da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Træningselastikker og bånd: 8-tals-træningselastikker; Flade træningselastikker; Træningselastikker til hofter; Træningselastikker med håndtag
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Bandas elásticas y cintas para ejercicios: Bandas de resistencia en forma de ocho; Bandas de resistencia planas; Bandas de resistencia para cadera; Tubos de resistencia
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Cvičebné pásy a gumy: Odporové pásy v tvare osmičky; Ploché odporové pásy; Odporové pásy na bedrový kruh; Odporové trubice
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Träningsband och -slingor: Åttformade motståndsband; Platta motståndsband; Motståndsband för höft; Träningsslangar
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Taśmy i pętle do ćwiczeń: Gumy oporowe typu ósemka; Płaskie taśmy oporowe; Gumy oporowe typu Hip Band; Ekspandery rurkowe
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Faixas e argolas de exercício: Bandas de resistência em forma de oito; Bandas de resistência planas; Bandas de resistência para os glúteos; Tubos de resistência
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > エクササイズバンド・ループ: 8の字レジスタンスバンド; フラットレジスタンスバンド; ヒップサークルレジスタンスバンド; レジスタンスチューブ
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 健身拉力帶/拉力環: 8 字型拉力帶; 彈力帶; 翹臀圈拉力帶; 拉力繩
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Fasce e anelli per esercizi: Elastici di resistenza a otto; Fasce elastiche di resistenza piatte; Elastici fitness ad anello per glutei; Tubi elastici di resistenza
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยางและห่วงสำหรับออกกำลังกาย: ยางยืดออกกำลังกายรูปเลขแปด; ยางยืดแรงต้านแบบแบน; ยางยืดแรงต้านแบบวงแหวน; ยางยืดแรงต้านแบบสาย
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Faixas e loops de exercício: Elásticos tensores em formato de oito; Faixas elásticas de resistência; Faixas de resistência para glúteos; Tubos de resistência
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Rastezljive trake za vježbanje: Elastične trake za vježbanje u obliku osmice; Ravne elastične trake za vježbanje; Elastične trake za vježbanje za bedra; Otporne trake
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Bandes et cerceaux d’exercice: Bandes de résistance en huit; Bandes de résistance plates; Bandes de résistance pour fessiers; Tubes de résistance
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 운동용 밴드/루프: 8자형 저항 밴드; 플랫 저항 밴드; 힙 서클 저항 밴드; 저항 튜브
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Đai & vòng tập thể dục: Dây kháng lực hình số 8; Dây kháng lực dạng dẹt; Dây kháng lực tập mông; Dây kháng lực dạng ống
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Benzi pentru exerciții: Benzi elastice în formă de opt; Benzi de rezistență plate; Benzi elastice circulare pentru șolduri; Tuburi elastice de rezistență
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Pásky a gumy na cvičení: Posilovací gumy ve tvaru osmičky; Ploché posilovací gumy; Posilovací gumy na hýždě a stehna; Posilovací expandéry
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ελαστικές ταινίες γυμναστικής: Λάστιχα αντίστασης σχήματος 8; Επίπεδα λάστιχα αντίστασης; Λάστιχα αντίστασης γλουτών; Σωληνωτά λάστιχα αντίστασης
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Тренировъчни ластици: Ластици за съпротивление тип „осмица“; Плоски тренировъчни ластици; Ластици за съпротивление за бедра; Тръбни ластици за съпротивление
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 健身带和健身圈: 8 字形阻力带; 扁平阻力带; 翘臀圈; 阻力管
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Fitnessbanden en -lussen: Achtvormige weerstandsbanden; Platte weerstandsbanden; Hip circle-weerstandsbanden; Weerstandstubes
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Trakovi in zanke za vadbo: Uporni trakovi v obliki osmice; Ploščati elastični trakovi za vadbo; Uporni trakovi za čez pas; Uporne cevi
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Edzőszalagok és -hurkok: Nyolcas alakú ellenállási szalagok; Lapos ellenállási szalagok; Csípőerősítő szalagok; Ellenállási gumikötelek
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Treningsbånd og -løkker: Åttetalls-treningsstrikker; Flate treningsstrikker; Hoftestrikker; Treningsstrikker med håndtak
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Fitnessbänder: Achter-Widerstandsbänder; Flache Widerstandsbänder; Hip-Circle-Widerstandsbänder; Widerstandstubes
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Jumppanauhat ja voimanauhat: Kahdeksikon muotoiset vastuskuminauhat; Litteät vastuskuminauhat; Pakarakuminauhat; Tuubikuminauhat
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Exercise Bands & Loops: Figure Eight Resistance Bands; Flat Resistance Bands; Hip Circle Resistance Bands; Resistance Tubes
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Ленты-эспандеры: Эспандеры «восьмерка»; Ленточные эспандеры; Тканевые фитнес-резинки; Трубчатые эспандеры
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Egzersiz Bantları ve Döngüleri: Sekiz şekilli direnç bantları; Düz direnç bantları; Kalça direnç bantları; Tüp direnç lastikleri
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Treniruočių juostos ir kilpos: Aštuoniukės formos pasipriešinimo gumos; Plokščios pasipriešinimo juostos; Klubų žiedinės pasipriešinimo gumos; Atsparumo vamzdeliai